New York, session 2025-2026, A10708.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Chapter 5 of title 20 of the administrative code of the 2 city of New York is amended by adding a new subchapter 13-A to read as 3 follows: 4 SUBCHAPTER 13-A 5 SALES OF ALL TERRAIN VEHICLES AND OFF-HIGHWAY MOTORCYCLES 6 § 20-764 Off-highway motorcycle. a. For purposes of this section, an 7 off-highway motorcycle shall have the same definition set forth in 8 section one hundred twenty-five-a of the vehicle and traffic law. 9 b. No corporation, partnership, firm, sole proprietorship or other 10 entity or person shall sell, lease or rent or attempt to sell, lease or 11 rent an off-highway motorcycle to another person in the city of New 12 York. 13 c. Any corporation, partnership, firm, sole proprietorship or other 14 entity or person who violates subdivision b of this section shall be 15 liable for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for a first violation 16 and a civil penalty of two thousand dollars for each subsequent 17 violation within one year. Each sale, lease or rental, or attempt to 18 sell, lease or rent, an off-highway motorcycle shall be deemed a sepa- 19 rate violation. Authorized employees of the department, the police 20 department, and of any other agency designated by the mayor, shall have 21 the authority to enforce the provisions of this section. Such penalties 22 shall be recovered in a civil action or in a proceeding commenced by the 23 service of a notice of hearing that shall be returnable before the 24 administrative tribunal of the department. In addition, such violation 25 shall be a traffic infraction and shall be punishable in accordance with 26 section eighteen hundred of the vehicle and traffic law. 27 d. Any off-highway motorcycle that has been used or is being used in 28 violation of the provisions of this section may be impounded and shall 29 not be released until any and all removal charges and storage fees and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05688-01-5 A. 10708 2 1 the applicable fines have been paid or a bond has been posted in an 2 amount satisfactory to the commissioner of the agency that impounded 3 such device. 4 § 20-766 All terrain vehicle. a. For purposes of this section, an all 5 terrain vehicle shall have the same definition set forth in section 6 twenty-two hundred eighty-one of the vehicle and traffic law. 7 b. No corporation, partnership, firm, sole proprietorship or other 8 entity or person shall sell, lease or rent or attempt to sell, lease or 9 rent an all terrain vehicle to another person in the city of New York. 10 c. Any corporation, partnership, firm, sole proprietorship or other 11 entity or person who violates subdivision b of this section shall be 12 liable for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for a first violation 13 and a civil penalty of two thousand dollars for each subsequent 14 violation within one year. Each sale, lease or rental, or attempt to 15 sell, lease or rent, an all terrain vehicle shall be deemed a separate 16 violation. Authorized employees of the department, the police depart- 17 ment, and of any other agency designated by the mayor, shall have the 18 authority to enforce the provisions of this section. Such penalties 19 shall be recovered in a civil action or in a proceeding commenced by the 20 service of a notice of hearing that shall be returnable before the 21 administrative tribunal of the department. In addition, such violation 22 shall be a traffic infraction and shall be punishable in accordance with 23 section eighteen hundred of the vehicle and traffic law. 24 d. Any all terrain vehicle that has been used or is being used in 25 violation of the provisions of this section may be impounded and shall 26 not be released until any and all removal charges and storage fees and 27 the applicable fines have been paid or a bond has been posted in an 28 amount satisfactory to the commissioner of the agency that impounded 29 such device. 30 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 2282 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 31 amended by chapter 402 of the laws of 1986, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 6. Dealers. (a) Any person who is a dealer, and who is not registered 34 as a dealer pursuant to section four hundred fifteen of this chapter, 35 shall register as an ATV dealer and operate in accordance with the rules 36 and regulations of the commissioner for ATV dealers. The commissioner, 37 upon receipt of an application and the required fee, shall assign a 38 distinctive dealer registration number to the registrant and issue an 39 appropriate registration certificate to [him] the registrant and assign 40 two dealer demonstrator registration numbers and upon the payment of the 41 appropriate fee, such additional numbers as shall be requested. Dealer 42 registrations and dealer demonstrator registration numbers shall not be 43 transferable. Provided, however, the commissioner may limit the number 44 of dealer demonstration registration numbers issued to a dealer. 45 (b) No dealer shall sell or offer for retail sale any ATV, other than 46 an ATV identified and sold for use only in off-highway competitions, 47 which is not equipped with all equipment necessary for the registration 48 of an ATV. 49 (c) No dealer shall sell or offer for retail sale any ATV, other than 50 an ATV identified and sold for use outside the city of New York. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 52 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective imme- 53 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 54 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 55 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.